Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-957
Peru State College; programs authorized; approval; required, when.

Peru State College may maintain its existing baccalaureate general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate professional degree programs and shall limit new baccalaureate degree programs to the needs of its unique service area generally defined as the state's southeast region. Subject to approval by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, Peru State College may offer other master's degree programs upon demonstration of a compelling need in disciplines in which it has a demonstrated capacity as authorized and approved by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 41;

Laws 2006, LB 962, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB887, § 11.